District of Columbia statutes.
46-357.02

Applicability.

This subchapter applies only to a support proceeding under the Convention. In such a proceeding, if a provision of this subchapter is inconsistent with subchapters I through VI of this chapter [§§ 46-351.01 through 46-356.16], this subchapter controls.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 702, 63 DCR 222